Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Taxes

7-3-201. Privilege taxes.

Any metropolitan government created and established pursuant to chapters 1-3 of this title shall be authorized and empowered to levy within its general services district any and every privilege tax that a county is now authorized to levy or may hereafter be authorized to levy. When the amount of the authorized privilege tax shall depend upon the population of the county, then the population of the general services district shall be determinative of the authorized levy.

In addition to the privilege taxes authorized in subsection (a), any such metropolitan government by action of its metropolitan council shall be authorized and empowered to levy within its urban services district any and every privilege tax that an incorporated city or municipality is now authorized to levy or may hereafter be authorized to levy. When the amount of the authorized privilege tax shall depend upon population of the incorporated city or municipality, then the population of the urban services district shall be determinative of the authorized levy.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-3713.

7-3-202. Municipal stadium seat privilege tax.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Event” means any activity with a paid admission fee that takes place primarily on or directly above the playing surface at the municipal stadium;

“Metropolitan government” means those counties and municipalities adopting the metropolitan form of government;

“Municipal stadium” means a structure with seats for not less than thirty thousand (30,000) spectators, which is constructed after July 7, 1977, and which is used primarily for sporting events and other related activities and is currently financed or was financed by general obligation bonds, revenue bonds or other indebtedness issued by a metropolitan government or any public instrumentality of a metropolitan government; and

“Promoter” means any person, and any agent or representative of the person, engaged in the sale or offering for sale of tickets to an event.

There is authorized a privilege tax upon the privilege of attending any event at the municipal stadium in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the consideration charged for spectators attending the event.

Subject to the limitation in subdivision (b)(1)(A), the amount of the tax shall be established from time to time by ordinance of the local legislative body of the metropolitan government; provided, however, that the tax as adopted by the local legislative body shall not be at a rate or in an amount that would create a reimbursement obligation to the primary tenant of the municipal stadium under any lease existing on January 1, 2009, so long as the lease is in effect.

The privilege tax authorized in this section shall not apply to an event at a municipal stadium for the benefit of a public college or university where the public college or university utilizes the municipal stadium for a majority of its home football games in a particular season.

The privilege tax authorized in this section shall not apply to:

Non-ticketed or complimentary admissions credentials; or

Tickets for which no monetary consideration is received to the extent the number of the tickets does not exceed the lesser of five percent (5%) of the total number of tickets offered for sale to the event or three thousand two hundred fifty (3,250).

The privilege tax authorized in this section shall apply to the first, initial or original sale of tickets and shall not apply to re-sales or redistributions of the tickets.

The privilege tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other taxes or fees levied or authorized to be levied on the sale of any event ticket, whether in the form of excise, license or privilege taxes and shall be in addition to all other fees and taxes now levied or authorized to be levied; provided, however, that the privilege tax authorized in this section shall not be subject to state or local option taxes under title 67, chapter 6.

The privilege tax authorized in this section shall be added to the ticket price charged for admission to the municipal stadium by each promoter of the event. The promoter shall collect the privilege tax and remit it to the metropolitan government.

By ordinance, the legislative body of the metropolitan government may authorize the promoter to deduct up to two percent (2%) of the privilege tax collected by the promoter to defray the cost of accounting and remitting the tax to the metropolitan government.

The proceeds from the privilege tax authorized by this section and received by the metropolitan government shall be used by the metropolitan government exclusively to defray the cost of constructing, operating, renovating, expanding or improving the municipal stadium or for the payment of debt service on bonds or other indebtedness issued by the metropolitan government or any public instrumentality of the metropolitan government for the construction, operation, renovation, expansion or improvement of the municipal stadium.

This section shall only apply to those counties having a metropolitan form of government.

The privilege tax authorized by subdivision (b)(1) shall take effect upon the approval of the privilege tax by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the local legislative body of the metropolitan government.

Acts 1977, ch. 491, §§ 1-7, 9; T.C.A., § 6-3738; Acts 2009, ch. 530, § 60.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1977, ch. 491, compiled in this section, was passed by the metropolitan council of Nashville and Davidson County on November 15, 1977, and approved by the mayor on November 17, 1977.

7-3-203. Billing for taxes — Installment payments.

A metropolitan government, as defined in §7-1-101, is hereby authorized by ordinance or resolution of its governing body to direct or permit its trustee, as a convenience to its taxpayers, to prepare and send to each owner of taxable property a bill for the amount of taxes due on the property. Where the property is located within the urban services district, the governing body may authorize the tax for the urban services district and the tax for the general services district to be consolidated into one (1) tax bill, computed on the combined tax rate of both of the taxing districts; provided, that the tax rate for each of such districts shall be shown plainly on the face of the consolidated tax bill. In any case where the taxpayer pays as much as one half (½) of the total amount of the combined tax bill not later than October 31 of the year for which the taxes are due, and the remaining one half (½) not later than February 28 of the following year, no interest or penalty shall be charged, notwithstanding any state law, charter or ordinance of the metropolitan government to the contrary.

Acts 1963, ch. 43, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3724.

7-3-204. Municipal auditorium events — Privilege tax.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Metropolitan government” means those counties and municipalities adopting the metropolitan form of government; and

“Municipal auditorium” means a structure with seats for not less than ten thousand (10,000) spectators, which is constructed after July 7, 1977, and which is used primarily for public events and other related activities and financed either by general obligation bonds or revenue bonds by the metropolitan government.

There is hereby authorized a privilege tax upon the privilege of attending any event at the municipal auditorium, in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the consideration charged for spectators attending the event. This authorization to levy tax shall expire on January 1 following the maturity and redemption of the indebtedness for the auditorium. The tax shall be approved by resolution of the metropolitan council.

The tax levied in this section shall be in addition to all other taxes levied or authorized to be levied, whether in the form of excise, license, or privilege taxes, and shall be in addition to all other fees and taxes now levied or authorized to be levied.

The tax shall be added by each promoter of the event to the ticket price charged for admission to the municipal auditorium. The tax shall then be remitted to the metropolitan government.

The proceeds from the tax levied in this section shall be retained by the metropolitan government and utilized to defray the cost of operating and constructing the municipal auditorium.

This section shall only apply to those counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1987, ch. 452, § 1.